District of Columbia statutes.
1-308.26

Repealed

Participant obligations.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-203, § 7, 53 DCR 9055
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3003, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Repayment Program Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-512, October 25, 2006, 53 DCR 9086).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Repayment Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-563, December 19, 2006, 53 DCR 10259).